Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-1913.04
Anaphylaxis policy; required, when; publication.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, a program licensed pursuant to the Child Care Licensing Act without a policy in effect at such time, that cares for a child with a known food or other allergy, shall adopt a specific policy to address incidents of anaphylaxis involving children at the program. The adopted policy may use the model policy for use in licensed child care programs developed pursuant to section 71-1965 as a guide.

(2) A program licensed pursuant to the Child Care Licensing Act that cares for a child with a known food or other allergy shall publish such program's anaphylaxis policy in the parent handbook, program manual, or other similar publication of the program which sets forth the procedures and standards of the program.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to change the personal rights, liabilities, and immunities granted pursuant to section 25-21,280 of certain individuals responding to or treating life-threatening asthma or a systemic allergic reaction.

Laws 2025, LB457, § 3.